Utah statutes.
9-8-202.   Appointment of director.

(1)  The chief administrative officer of the division shall be a director appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the board.

(2)  The director shall be experienced in administration and qualified by education or training in the field of state history.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

